src/morphology/hacks/tagger-hacks.lexc
[WORD_ID=punnittavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0punnittavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=punospäällysteiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0punospäällysteiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=puolikierroksisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0puolikierroksisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=puolivälistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0puolivälistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=puoltavaan][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0puoltavaan	#	;
[WORD_ID=puoltavaa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0puoltavaa	#	;
[WORD_ID=puoltavalla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:0puoltavalla	#	;
[WORD_ID=puoltavan][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0puoltavan	#	;
[WORD_ID=puoltava][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0puoltava	#	;
[WORD_ID=puoltavasta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:0puoltavasta	#	;
[WORD_ID=puoltavat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0puoltavat	#	;
[WORD_ID=puoltavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0puoltavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=puoltaviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0puoltaviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=puoltavin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:0puoltavin	#	;
[WORD_ID=puoltavista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0puoltavista	#	;
[WORD_ID=puolueettomin][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=SUP][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0puolueettomin	#	;
[WORD_ID=purjehtivaan][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0purjehtivaan	#	;
[WORD_ID=purjehtivia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0purjehtivia	#	;
[WORD_ID=purjehtivien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0purjehtivien	#	;
[WORD_ID=purjehtiviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0purjehtiviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=purjehtivilla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0purjehtivilla	#	;
[WORD_ID=purjehtiville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0purjehtiville	#	;
[WORD_ID=purjehtivilta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:0purjehtivilta	#	;
[WORD_ID=purjehtivissa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0purjehtivissa	#	;
[WORD_ID=purjehtivista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0purjehtivista	#	;
[WORD_ID=puukasvuinen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0puukasvuinen	#	;
[WORD_ID=puukohtainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0puukohtainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=puukohtaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0puukohtaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=puupohjaisesta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:0puupohjaisesta	#	;
[WORD_ID=puupohjaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0puupohjaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=puupohjaisille][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0puupohjaisille	#	;
[WORD_ID=puupohjaisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0puupohjaisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=puutteellisemmin][POS=ADJECTIVE][POS=ADVERB][CMP=CMP]:0puutteellisemmin	#	;
[WORD_ID=puuttumattomien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0puuttumattomien	#	;
[WORD_ID=puutuville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0puutuville	#	;
[WORD_ID=puuvillansiemenistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0puuvillansiemenistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=puuvillapohjaisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0puuvillapohjaisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyreneistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0pyreneistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyrkivien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0pyrkivien	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyrkiviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0pyrkiviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyrkiville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0pyrkiville	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyrkivillä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0pyrkivillä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyrkiviltä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:0pyrkiviltä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyrkivissä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0pyrkivissä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyrkiviä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0pyrkiviä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyrkivään][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0pyrkivään	#	;
[WORD_ID=pystytasoista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0pystytasoista	#	;
[WORD_ID=pysyttelevistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0pysyttelevistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pysyttelevään][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0pysyttelevään	#	;
[WORD_ID=pysähtyvien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0pysähtyvien	#	;
[WORD_ID=pysäytettävien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0pysäytettävien	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyydettävien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0pyydettävien	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyydettäviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0pyydettäviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyydettäville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0pyydettäville	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyydettävillä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0pyydettävillä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyydettävistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0pyydettävistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyydettäviä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0pyydettäviä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyynnöstä][POS=ADPOSITION]:0pyynnöstä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyyntiponnistusyksikkökohtaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0pyyntiponnistusyksikkökohtaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyyntiponnistusyksikkökohtaisia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0pyyntiponnistusyksikkökohtaisia	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyytävien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0pyytävien	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyytäviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0pyytäviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyytäville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0pyytäville	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyytävillä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0pyytävillä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyytävissä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0pyytävissä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyytävistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0pyytävistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyytäviä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0pyytäviä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyytävällä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:0pyytävällä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyytävältä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:0pyytävältä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyytävän][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0pyytävän	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyytävä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0pyytävä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyytävässä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:0pyytävässä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyytävät][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0pyytävät	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyytävään][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0pyytävään	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyytävää][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0pyytävää	#	;
[WORD_ID=pyöristämättömistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0pyöristämättömistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=päinvastoin][POS=ADVERB]:0päinvastoin	#	;
[WORD_ID=päivitettävien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0päivitettävien	#	;
[WORD_ID=päivittämättömien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0päivittämättömien	#	;
[WORD_ID=päivittävissä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0päivittävissä	#	;
[WORD_ID=päivystävien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0päivystävien	#	;
[WORD_ID=päivystäville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0päivystäville	#	;
[WORD_ID=päiväkohtainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0päiväkohtainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=päiväkohtaisella][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:0päiväkohtaisella	#	;
[WORD_ID=päiväkohtaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0päiväkohtaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=päiväkohtaisesta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:0päiväkohtaisesta	#	;
[WORD_ID=päiväkohtaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0päiväkohtaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=päiväkohtaisia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0päiväkohtaisia	#	;
[WORD_ID=päiväkohtaisille][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0päiväkohtaisille	#	;
[WORD_ID=päiväkohtaista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0päiväkohtaista	#	;
[WORD_ID=päiväkohtaisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0päiväkohtaisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=pärjäävien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0pärjäävien	#	;
[WORD_ID=pärjääviä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0pärjääviä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pääasiasiallista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0pääasiasiallista	#	;
[WORD_ID=päällystävien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0päällystävien	#	;
[WORD_ID=pääomanliikkeisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0pääomanliikkeisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=pääomittavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0pääomittavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=pääosastokohtaista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0pääosastokohtaista	#	;
[WORD_ID=pääsevien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0pääsevien	#	;
[WORD_ID=pääsevistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0pääsevistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pääseviä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0pääseviä	#	;
[WORD_ID=pääsevä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0pääsevä	#	;
[WORD_ID=päästettävien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0päästettävien	#	;
[WORD_ID=päästettäville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0päästettäville	#	;
[WORD_ID=päätepisteisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0päätepisteisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=päätepisteistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0päätepisteistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=päätettävien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0päätettävien	#	;
[WORD_ID=päätettäviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0päätettäviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=päätettävissä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0päätettävissä	#	;
[WORD_ID=päätettävistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0päätettävistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=päätettäviä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0päätettäviä	#	;
[WORD_ID=-päätteiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0-päätteiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=-päätteisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0-päätteisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=päättäväisemmin][POS=ADJECTIVE][POS=ADVERB][CMP=CMP]:0päättäväisemmin	#	;
[WORD_ID=päätyvien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0päätyvien	#	;
[WORD_ID=päätöksentekokykyisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0päätöksentekokykyisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=pölytettävien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0pölytettävien	#	;
[WORD_ID=pölyttävien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0pölyttävien	#	;
[WORD_ID=pölyttäville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0pölyttäville	#	;
[WORD_ID=pölyäviä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0pölyäviä	#	;
[WORD_ID=raaka-aineista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0raaka-aineista	#	;
[WORD_ID=raakalihavalmisteista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0raakalihavalmisteista	#	;
[WORD_ID=raakamaitopohjaisia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0raakamaitopohjaisia	#	;
[WORD_ID=raakamaitopohjaisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0raakamaitopohjaisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=radikaalimmin][POS=ADJECTIVE][POS=ADVERB][CMP=CMP]:0radikaalimmin	#	;
[WORD_ID=radionuklidikohtaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0radionuklidikohtaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahastoimattomien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0rahastoimattomien	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahastoimattomista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0rahastoimattomista	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahastoivaan][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0rahastoivaan	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahastoivia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0rahastoivia	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahastoivien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0rahastoivien	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahastoiviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0rahastoiviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahastokohtaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0rahastokohtaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahastokohtaisia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0rahastokohtaisia	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoitettavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0rahoitettavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoitettavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0rahoitettavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoitettaviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0rahoitettaviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoitettaviksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:0rahoitettaviksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoitettavilla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0rahoitettavilla	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoitettaville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0rahoitettaville	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoitettavina][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:0rahoitettavina	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoitettavissa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0rahoitettavissa	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoitettavista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0rahoitettavista	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoittajakohtainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0rahoittajakohtainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoittajakohtaisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0rahoittajakohtaisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoittavaan][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0rahoittavaan	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoittavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0rahoittavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoittaviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0rahoittaviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoittaville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0rahoittaville	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoittavissa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0rahoittavissa	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoittavista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0rahoittavista	#	;
[WORD_ID=rahoituskurista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0rahoituskurista	#	;
[WORD_ID=raivattavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0raivattavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=raivattavilta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:0raivattavilta	#	;
[WORD_ID=raja-aitoja][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0raja-aitoja	#	;
[WORD_ID=raja-aitojen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0raja-aitojen	#	;
[WORD_ID=raja-arvoista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0raja-arvoista	#	;
[WORD_ID=rajaavan][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0rajaavan	#	;
